Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1

Horsemeat

53-7-101. Horsemeat sold or offered for sale to be denatured.

All horsemeat sold, offered for sale or exposed for sale shall be denatured with at least two percent (2%) charcoal or other similar inert ingredient and shall be in package form, and so labeled as to show that it contains horsemeat that has been denatured with at least two percent (2%) charcoal or other similar inert ingredient.

Acts 1949, ch. 183, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6579.23 (Williams, § 6596.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-906.

Cross-References. Penalty for violations, § 53-7-103.

Attorney General Opinions. The sale of horsemeat slaughtered in the state for human consumption is expressly prohibited by T.C.A. §§ 53-7-101 to -103, regardless of where the actual sale may occur. OAG 13-95, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 100 (11/27/13).

Comparative Legislation. Meat and poultry:

Ala. Code § 2-17-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-33-101 et seq.; § 20-60-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 26-2-60 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 257.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 75-33-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 265.300 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-549.15.

Va. Code § 3.1-723 et seq.

Collateral References. 35 Am. Jur. 2d Food § 35.

Food
1.10, 3, 11 et seq.

53-7-102. Enforcement — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's duly authorized representative is authorized to enforce § 53-7-101, and the commissioner is further authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the enforcement of § 53-7-101.

Acts 1949, ch. 183, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6579.24 (Williams, § 6596.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-907.

53-7-103. Penalty for violation of § 53-7-101.

Each person, firm or corporation violating § 53-7-101 commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1949, ch. 183, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 6579.25 (Williams, § 6596.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.